Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6414.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 29a. A county, city, or township clerk may investigate, or cause to be investigated, any alleged violation of the election laws or regulations by the secretary of state, the bureau of elections, the director of elections, or any staff member in either the secretary of state's office or the bureau of elections, and report that alleged violation to the attorney general or appropriate prosecuting attorney for further investigation and enforcement.